Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2815
Stipend.

The contracting agency shall pay a stipend to qualified design-builders that submit responsive proposals but are not selected. Payment of the stipend shall give the contracting agency ownership of the intellectual property contained in the proposals and alternative technical concepts. The amount of the stipend shall be at the discretion of the contracting agency as disclosed in the request for proposals.

Laws 2016, LB960, § 15;

Laws 2019, LB583, § 9.